Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 PROHIBITION ON POSSESSION OF CERTAIN FIREARMS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.712, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon. new text begin (a) new text end "Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon" means: (1) any of the following firearms: (i) Avtomat Kalashnikov (AK-47) semiautomatic rifle type; (ii) Beretta AR-70 and BM-59 semiautomatic rifle types; (iii) Colt AR-15 semiautomatic rifle type; (iv) Daewoo Max-1 and Max-2 semiautomatic rifle types; (v) Famas MAS semiautomatic rifle type; (vi) Fabrique Nationale FN-LAR and FN-FNC semiautomatic rifle types; (vii) Galil semiautomatic rifle type; (viii) Heckler & Koch HK-91, HK-93, and HK-94 semiautomatic rifle types; (ix) Ingram MAC-10 and MAC-11 semiautomatic pistol and carbine types; (x) Intratec TEC-9 semiautomatic pistol type; (xi) Sigarms SIG 550SP and SIG 551SP semiautomatic rifle types; (xii) SKS with detachable magazine semiautomatic rifle type; (xiii) Steyr AUG semiautomatic rifle type; (xiv) Street Sweeper and Striker-12 revolving-cylinder shotgun types; (xv) USAS-12 semiautomatic shotgun type; (xvi) Uzi semiautomatic pistol and carbine types; or (xvii) Valmet M76 and M78 semiautomatic rifle types; (2) any firearm that is another model made by the same manufacturer as one of the firearms listed in clause (1), and has the same action design as one of the listed firearms, and is a redesigned, renamed, or renumbered version of one of the firearms listed in clause (1), or has a slight modification or enhancement, including but not limited to a folding or retractable stock; adjustable sight; case deflector for left-handed shooters; shorter barrel; wooden, plastic, or metal stock; larger clip size; different caliber; or a bayonet mount; and (3) any firearm that has been manufactured or sold by another company under a licensing agreement with a manufacturer of one of the firearms listed in clause (1) entered into after the effective date of Laws 1993, chapter 326, to manufacture or sell firearms that are identical or nearly identical to those listed in clause (1), or described in clause (2), regardless of the company of production or country of origin. The weapons listed in clause (1), except those listed in items (iii), (ix), (x), (xiv), and (xv), are the weapons the importation of which was barred by the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms of the United States Department of the Treasury in July 1989. deleted text begin Except as otherwise specifically provided in paragraph (d), a firearm is not a "semiautomatic military-style assault weapon" if it is generally recognized as particularly suitable for or readily adaptable to sporting purposes under United States Code, title 18, section 925, paragraph (d)(3), or any regulations adopted pursuant to that law. deleted text end new text begin (b) Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon also includes any: new text end new text begin (1) semiautomatic rifle that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (i) a pistol grip or thumbhole stock; new text end new text begin (ii) any feature capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand; new text end new text begin (iii) a folding or telescoping stock; new text end new text begin (iv) a shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially or completely encircles the barrel, allowing the bearer to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being burned, but excluding a slide that encloses the barrel; or new text end new text begin (v) a flash suppressor; new text end new text begin (2) semiautomatic pistol or any semiautomatic, centerfire, or rimfire rifle with a fixed magazine that has the capacity to accept more than ten rounds of ammunition; new text end new text begin (3) semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (i) any feature capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand; new text end new text begin (ii) a folding, telescoping, or thumbhole stock; new text end new text begin (iii) a shroud attached to the barrel, or that partially or completely encircles the barrel, allowing the bearer to hold the firearm with the nontrigger hand without being burned, but excluding a slide that encloses the barrel; new text end new text begin (iv) the capacity to accept a detachable magazine at any location outside of the pistol grip; or new text end new text begin (v) a threaded barrel capable of accepting a barrel extension, flash suppressor, forward hand grip, or silencer; new text end new text begin (4) semiautomatic shotgun that has one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (i) a pistol grip or thumbhole stock; new text end new text begin (ii) any feature capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can be held by the nontrigger hand; new text end new text begin (iii) a folding or telescoping stock; new text end new text begin (iv) a fixed magazine capacity in excess of ten rounds; or new text end new text begin (v) an ability to accept a detachable magazine; new text end new text begin (5) shotgun with a revolving cylinder; or new text end new text begin (6) conversion kit, part, or combination of parts from which a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon can be assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person. new text end new text begin (c) Semiautomatic military-style assault weapon does not mean any firearm described in this paragraph that has been made permanently inoperable. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [624.7145] SEMIAUTOMATIC MILITARY-STYLE ASSAULT WEAPONS; PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "appropriate law enforcement agency" means the organized full-time police department of the municipality where the person resides or the county sheriff if there is no municipal police department where the person resides; and new text end new text begin (2) "transfer" means a sale, gift, loan, assignment, or other delivery to another, whether or not for consideration. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin It is unlawful for a person to transfer, own, or possess semiautomatic military-style assault weapons. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin Subdivision 2 does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) any government officer, agent, or employee; member of the armed forces of the United States; or peace officer, to the extent that the person is otherwise authorized to acquire or possess a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon and does so while acting within the scope of the person's duties; new text end new text begin (2) the manufacture of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon by a firearms manufacturer for the purpose of sale to any branch of the armed forces of the United States or to a law enforcement agency within Minnesota for use by that agency or the agency's employees, provided the manufacturer is properly licensed under applicable laws; or new text end new text begin (3) the transfer of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon by a dealer that is properly licensed under applicable laws to any branch of the armed forces of the United States or to a law enforcement agency within Minnesota for use by that agency or the agency's employees for law enforcement, provided that the dealer does not have the semiautomatic military-style assault weapon in possession for more than 120 days from the date of acquisition to the date of delivery to the armed forces or law enforcement purchaser. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Current owners; certification of ownership of semiautomatic military-style assault weapons. new text end new text begin (a) A person who legally owned or possessed a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon before January 1, 2027, and who desires to keep ownership or possession of the device must request certification of ownership of the device from the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension and appropriate law enforcement agency by May 1, 2027. The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension and appropriate law enforcement agency must provide the person with a duplicate copy of their request for certification. new text end new text begin (b) A person described in paragraph (a) must: new text end new text begin (1) safely and securely store the device pursuant to the regulations adopted by the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension; new text end new text begin (2) agree to allow the appropriate law enforcement agency to inspect the storage of the device to ensure compliance with this subdivision; new text end new text begin (3) renew the certification of ownership every three years; new text end new text begin (4) possess the device only on property owned or immediately controlled by the person, while engaged in the legal use of the device at a duly licensed firing range, or while transporting the item in compliance with applicable law; and new text end new text begin (5) report the loss or theft of the device to the appropriate law enforcement agency within 48 hours of the time the discovery of the loss or theft was made or should have been made. new text end new text begin (c) Semiautomatic military-style assault weapons regulated under this subdivision must not be transferred, except for transfer to the appropriate law enforcement agency for the purpose of surrendering the item for destruction. new text end new text begin (d) The certified owner or possessor of a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon must not purchase or receive additional semiautomatic military-style assault weapons. new text end new text begin (e) The appropriate law enforcement agency may charge a fee for each certification and certification renewal pursuant to this subdivision. new text end new text begin (f) Persons acquiring semiautomatic military-style assault weapons by inheritance, bequest, or succession must, within 120 days of acquiring title, do one of the following: new text end new text begin (1) surrender the device to the appropriate law enforcement agency for destruction; new text end new text begin (2) modify the device to render it permanently inoperable; or new text end new text begin (3) remove the device from the state. new text end new text begin (g) A person who owns or possesses a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon before January 1, 2027, who does not elect to certify ownership of the device as required in this subdivision must do one of the following before January 1, 2027: new text end new text begin (1) surrender the device to the appropriate law enforcement agency for destruction; new text end new text begin (2) modify the device to render it permanently inoperable; or new text end new text begin (3) remove the device from the state. new text end new text begin (h) The superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension must: new text end new text begin (1) adopt regulations specifying how a person who lawfully owns a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon must safely and securely store the device when the device is not being used; and new text end new text begin (2) implement a certification system. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A person who violates subdivision 2 or 4, paragraph (a) or (g), is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $25,000, or both. new text end new text begin (b) A person who knowingly violates subdivision 4, paragraph (b), (c), (d), or (f), is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation is guilty of a felony. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding sections 609.035 and 609.04, a prosecution or conviction for violation of this section is not a bar to conviction of, or punishment for, any other crime. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end ARTICLE 2 CONFORMING AMENDMENTS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.66, subdivision 1f, is amended to read: Subd. 1f. Gross misdemeanor; transferring firearm without background check. A person, other than a federally licensed firearms dealer, who transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to another without complying with the transfer requirements of section 624.7132deleted text begin ,deleted text end is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the transferee possesses or uses the weapon within one year after the transfer in furtherance of a felony crime of violence, and if: (1) the transferee was prohibited from possessing the weapon under section 624.713 at the time of the transfer; or (2) it was reasonably foreseeable at the time of the transfer that the transferee was likely to use or possess the weapon in furtherance of a felony crime of violence. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.713, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Ineligible persons. The following persons shall not be entitled to possess ammunition or a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon or, except for clause (1), any other firearm: (1) a person under the age of 18 years except that a person under 18 may possess ammunition designed for use in a firearm that the person may lawfully possess and may carry or possess a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon (i) deleted text begin in the actual presence or under the direct supervision of the person's parent or guardian, (ii)deleted text end for the purpose of military drill under the auspices of a legally recognized military organization and under competent supervision, deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin or (ii)new text end for the purpose of instruction, competition, or target practice on a firing range approved by the chief of police or county sheriff in whose jurisdiction the range is located and under direct supervisiondeleted text begin ; or (iv)deleted text end new text begin . A person under 18 may possess ammunition designed for use in a firearm that the person may lawfully possess and may carry or possess a pistolnew text end if the person new text begin (i) new text end has successfully completed a course designed to teach marksmanship and safety with a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end and approved by the commissioner of natural resourcesnew text begin , or (ii) is in the actual presence or under the direct supervision of the person's parent or guardiannew text end ; (2) except as otherwise provided in clause (9), a person who has been convicted of, or adjudicated delinquent or convicted as an extended jurisdiction juvenile for committing, in this state or elsewhere, a crime of violence. For purposes of this section, crime of violence includes crimes in other states or jurisdictions which would have been crimes of violence as herein defined if they had been committed in this state; (3) a person who is or has ever been committed in Minnesota or elsewhere by a judicial determination that the person is mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or mentally ill and dangerous to the public, as defined in section 253B.02, to a treatment facility, or who has ever been found incompetent to stand trial or not guilty by reason of mental illness, unless the person's ability to possess a firearm and ammunition has been restored under subdivision 4; (4) a person who has been convicted in Minnesota or elsewhere of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor violation of chapter 152, unless three years have elapsed since the date of conviction and, during that time, the person has not been convicted of any other such violation of chapter 152 or a similar law of another state; or a person who is or has ever been committed by a judicial determination for treatment for the habitual use of a controlled substance or marijuana, as defined in sections 152.01 and 152.02, unless the person's ability to possess a firearm and ammunition has been restored under subdivision 4; (5) a person who has been committed to a treatment facility in Minnesota or elsewhere by a judicial determination that the person is chemically dependent as defined in section 253B.02, unless the person has completed treatment or the person's ability to possess a firearm and ammunition has been restored under subdivision 4. Property rights may not be abated but access may be restricted by the courts; (6) a peace officer who is informally admitted to a treatment facility pursuant to section 253B.04 for chemical dependency, unless the officer possesses a certificate from the head of the treatment facility discharging or provisionally discharging the officer from the treatment facility. Property rights may not be abated but access may be restricted by the courts; (7) a person, including a person under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, who has been charged with committing a crime of violence and has been placed in a pretrial diversion program by the court before disposition, until the person has completed the diversion program and the charge of committing the crime of violence has been dismissed; (8) except as otherwise provided in clause (9), a person who has been convicted in another state of committing an offense similar to the offense described in section 609.224, subdivision 3, against a family or household member or section 609.2242, subdivision 3, unless three years have elapsed since the date of conviction and, during that time, the person has not been convicted of any other violation of section 609.224, subdivision 3, or 609.2242, subdivision 3, or a similar law of another state; (9) a person who has been convicted in this state or elsewhere of assaulting a family or household member and who was found by the court to have used a firearm in any way during commission of the assault is prohibited from possessing any type of firearm or ammunition for the period determined by the sentencing court; (10) a person who: (i) has been convicted in any court of a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year; (ii) is a fugitive from justice as a result of having fled from any state to avoid prosecution for a crime or to avoid giving testimony in any criminal proceeding; (iii) is an unlawful user of any controlled substance as defined in chapter 152. The use of medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products by a patient enrolled in the registry program or the use of adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products by a person 21 years of age or older does not constitute the unlawful use of a controlled substance under this item; (iv) has been judicially committed to a treatment facility in Minnesota or elsewhere as a person who is mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or mentally ill and dangerous to the public, as defined in section 253B.02; (v) is an alien who is illegally or unlawfully in the United States; (vi) has been discharged from the armed forces of the United States under dishonorable conditions; (vii) has renounced the person's citizenship having been a citizen of the United States; or (viii) is disqualified from possessing a firearm under United States Code, title 18, section 922(g)(8) or (9), as amended through March 1, 2014; (11) a person who has been convicted of the following offenses at the gross misdemeanor level, unless three years have elapsed since the date of conviction and, during that time, the person has not been convicted of any other violation of these sections: section 609.229 (crimes committed for the benefit of a gang); 609.2231, subdivision 4 (assaults motivated by bias); 609.255 (false imprisonment); 609.378 (neglect or endangerment of a child); 609.582, subdivision 4 (burglary in the fourth degree); 609.665 (setting a spring gun); 609.71 (riot); or 609.749 (harassment or stalking). For purposes of this paragraph, the specified gross misdemeanor convictions include crimes committed in other states or jurisdictions which would have been gross misdemeanors if conviction occurred in this state; (12) a person who has been convicted of a violation of section 609.224 if the court determined that the assault was against a family or household member in accordance with section 609.2242, subdivision 3 (domestic assault), unless three years have elapsed since the date of conviction and, during that time, the person has not been convicted of another violation of section 609.224 or a violation of a section listed in clause (11); (13) a person who is subject to an order for protection as described in section 260C.201, subdivision 3, paragraph (d), or 518B.01, subdivision 6, paragraph (g); or (14) a person who is subject to an extreme risk protection order as described in section 624.7172 or 624.7174. A person who issues a certificate pursuant to this section in good faith is not liable for damages resulting or arising from the actions or misconduct with a firearm or ammunition committed by the individual who is the subject of the certificate. The prohibition in this subdivision relating to the possession of firearms other than pistols and semiautomatic military-style assault weapons does not apply retroactively to persons who are prohibited from possessing a pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon under this subdivision before August 1, 1994. The lifetime prohibition on possessing, receiving, shipping, or transporting firearms and ammunition for persons convicted or adjudicated delinquent of a crime of violence in clause (2), applies only to offenders who are discharged from sentence or court supervision for a crime of violence on or after August 1, 1993. Participation as a patient in the registry program or use of adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products by a person 21 years of age or older does not disqualify the person from possessing firearms and ammunition under this section. For purposes of this section, "judicial determination" means a court proceeding pursuant to sections 253B.07 to 253B.09 or a comparable law from another state. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 624.7131, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Information. Any person may apply for a transferee permit by providing the following information in writing to the chief of police of an organized full time police department of the municipality in which the person resides or to the county sheriff if there is no such local chief of police: (1) the name, residence, telephone number, and driver's license number or nonqualification certificate number, if any, of the proposed transferee; (2) the sex, date of birth, height, weight, and color of eyes, and distinguishing physical characteristics, if any, of the proposed transferee; (3) a statement that the proposed transferee authorizes the release to the local police authority of commitment information about the proposed transferee maintained by the Direct Care and Treatment executive board, to the extent that the information relates to the proposed transferee's eligibility to possess a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end under section 624.713, subdivision 1; and (4) a statement by the proposed transferee that the proposed transferee is not prohibited by section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end . The statements shall be signed and dated by the person applying for a permit. At the time of application, the local police authority shall provide the applicant with a dated receipt for the application. The statement under clause (3) must comply with any applicable requirements of Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, sections 2.31 to 2.35, with respect to consent to disclosure of alcohol or drug abuse patient records. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7131, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Transfer report not required. A person who transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person exhibiting a valid transferee permit issued pursuant to this section or a valid permit to carry issued pursuant to section 624.714 is not required to file a transfer report pursuant to section 624.7132, subdivision 1. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 624.7132, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Required information. Except as provided in this section and section 624.7131, every person who agrees to transfer a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end shall report the following information in writing to the chief of police of the organized full-time police department of the municipality where the proposed transferee resides or to the appropriate county sheriff if there is no such local chief of police: (1) the name, residence, telephone number, and driver's license number or nonqualification certificate number, if any, of the proposed transferee; (2) the sex, date of birth, height, weight, and color of eyes, and distinguishing physical characteristics, if any, of the proposed transferee; (3) a statement that the proposed transferee authorizes the release to the local police authority of commitment information about the proposed transferee maintained by the Direct Care and Treatment executive board, to the extent that the information relates to the proposed transferee's eligibility to possess a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end under section 624.713, subdivision 1; (4) a statement by the proposed transferee that the transferee is not prohibited by section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end ; and (5) the address of the place of business of the transferor. The report shall be signed and dated by the transferor and the proposed transferee. The report shall be delivered by the transferor to the chief of police or sheriff no later than three days after the date of the agreement to transfer, excluding weekends and legal holidays. The statement under clause (3) must comply with any applicable requirements of Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, sections 2.31 to 2.35, with respect to consent to disclosure of alcohol or drug abuse patient records. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Notification. The chief of police or sheriff shall notify the transferor and proposed transferee in writing as soon as possible if the chief or sheriff determines that the proposed transferee is prohibited by section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end . The notification to the transferee shall specify the grounds for the disqualification of the proposed transferee and shall set forth in detail the transferee's right of appeal under subdivision 13. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Delivery. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 7 or 8, no person shall deliver a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a proposed transferee until 30 days after the date the agreement to transfer is delivered to a chief of police or sheriff in accordance with subdivision 1 unless the chief of police or sheriff waives all or a portion of the waiting period. The chief of police or sheriff may waive all or a portion of the waiting period in writing if the chief of police or sheriff: (1) determines the proposed transferee is not disqualified prior to the waiting period concluding; or (2) finds that the transferee requires access to a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end because of a threat to the life of the transferee or of any member of the household of the transferee. Prior to modifying the waiting period under the authority granted in clause (2), the chief of police or sheriff must first determine that the proposed transferee is not prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law. No person shall deliver a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a proposed transferee after receiving a written notification that the chief of police or sheriff has determined that the proposed transferee is prohibited by section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end . If the transferor makes a report of transfer and receives no written notification of disqualification of the proposed transferee within 30 business days after delivery of the agreement to transfer, the pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end may be delivered to the transferee, unless the transferor knows the transferee is ineligible to possess a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end . Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Grounds for disqualification. (a) The chief of police or sheriff shall deny an application if the proposed transferee is: (1) prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end ; (2) determined to be a danger to self or the public when in possession of firearms under paragraph (b); or (3) listed in the criminal gang investigative data system under section 299C.091. (b) A chief of police or sheriff shall deny an application if there exists a substantial likelihood that the proposed transferee is a danger to self or the public when in possession of a firearm. To deny the application under this paragraph, the chief of police or sheriff must provide the applicant with written notification and the specific factual basis justifying the denial, including the source of the factual basis. The chief of police or sheriff must inform the applicant of the applicant's right to submit, within 20 business days, any additional documentation relating to the propriety of the denial. Upon receiving any additional documentation, the chief of police or sheriff must reconsider the denial and inform the applicant within 15 business days of the result of the reconsideration. Any denial after reconsideration must be in the same form and substance as the original denial and must specifically address any continued deficiencies in light of the additional documentation submitted by the applicant. The applicant must be informed of the right to seek de novo review of the denial as provided in subdivision 13. (c) A chief of police or sheriff need not process an application under this section if the person has had an application denied pursuant to paragraph (b) and less than six months have elapsed since the denial was issued or the person's appeal under subdivision 13 was denied, whichever is later. (d) A chief of police or sheriff who denies an application pursuant to paragraph (b) must provide a copy of the notice of disqualification to the chief of police or sheriff with joint jurisdiction over the applicant's residence. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Restriction on records. Except as provided for in section 624.7134, subdivision 3, paragraph (e), if, after a determination that the transferee is not a person prohibited by section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end , a transferee requests that no record be maintained of the fact of who is the transferee of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end , the chief of police or sheriff shall sign the transfer report and return it to the transferee as soon as possible. Thereafter, no government employee or agency shall maintain a record of the transfer that identifies the transferee, and the transferee shall retain the report of transfer. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Exclusions. Except as otherwise provided in section 609.66, subdivision 1f, this section shall not apply to transfers of antique firearms as curiosities or for their historical significance or value, transfers to or between federally licensed firearms dealers, transfers by order of court, involuntary transfers, transfers at death or the following transfers: (1) a transfer by a person other than a federally licensed firearms dealer; (2) a loan to a prospective transferee if the loan is intended for a period of no more than one day; (3) the delivery of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person for the purpose of repair, reconditioning or remodeling; (4) a loan by a teacher to a student in a course designed to teach marksmanship or safety with a pistol and approved by the commissioner of natural resources; (5) a loan between persons at a firearms collectors exhibition; (6) a loan between persons lawfully engaged in hunting or target shooting if the loan is intended for a period of no more than 12 hours; (7) a loan between law enforcement officers who have the power to make arrests other than citizen arrests; and (8) a loan between employees or between the employer and an employee in a business if the employee is required to carry a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end by reason of employment and is the holder of a valid permit to carry a pistol. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7132, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Penalties. (a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), a person who does any of the following is guilty of a gross misdemeanor: (1) transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end in violation of subdivisions 1 to 13; (2) transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person who has made a false statement in order to become a transferee, if the transferor knows or has reason to know the transferee has made the false statement; (3) knowingly becomes a transferee in violation of subdivisions 1 to 13; or (4) makes a false statement in order to become a transferee of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end knowing or having reason to know the statement is false. (b) A person who does either of the following is guilty of a felony: (1) transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person under the age of 18 in violation of subdivisions 1 to 13; or (2) transfers a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person under the age of 18 who has made a false statement in order to become a transferee, if the transferor knows or has reason to know the transferee has made the false statement. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7134, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Background check and evidence of identity. An unlicensed person is prohibited from transferring a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to any other unlicensed person, unless: (1) the transfer is made through a firearms dealer as provided for in subdivision 3; or (2) the transferee presents a valid transferee permit issued under section 624.7131 and a current state or federally issued identification. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7134, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Background check conducted by federally licensed firearms dealer. (a) Where both parties to a prospective transfer of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end are unlicensed persons, the transferor and transferee may appear jointly before a federally licensed firearms dealer with the firearm and request that the federally licensed firearms dealer conduct a background check on the transferee and facilitate the transfer. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a federally licensed firearms dealer who agrees to facilitate a transfer under this section shall: (1) process the transfer as though transferring the firearm from the dealer's inventory to the transferee; and (2) comply with all requirements of federal and state law that would apply if the firearms dealer were making the transfer, including at a minimum all background checks and record keeping requirements. The exception to the report of transfer process in section 624.7132, subdivision 12, clause (1), does not apply to transfers completed under this subdivision. (c) If the transferee is prohibited by federal law from purchasing or possessing the firearm or not entitled under state law to possess the firearm, neither the federally licensed firearms dealer nor the transferor shall transfer the firearm to the transferee. (d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, this section shall not prevent the transferor from: (1) removing the firearm from the premises of the federally licensed firearms dealer, or the gun show or event where the federally licensed firearms dealer is conducting business, as applicable, while the background check is being conducted, provided that the transferor must return to the federally licensed firearms dealer with the transferee before the transfer takes place, and the federally licensed firearms dealer must take possession of the firearm in order to complete the transfer; and (2) removing the firearm from the business premises of the federally licensed firearms dealer if the results of the background check indicate the transferee is prohibited by federal law from purchasing or possessing the firearm or not entitled under state law to possess the firearm. (e) A transferee who consents to participate in a transfer under this subdivision is not entitled to have the transfer report returned as provided for in section 624.7132, subdivision 10. (f) A firearms dealer may charge a reasonable fee for conducting a background check and facilitating a transfer between the transferor and transferee pursuant to this section. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7134, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Record of transfer; required information. (a) Unless a transfer is made through a firearms dealer as provided for in subdivision 3, when two unlicensed persons complete the transfer of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end , the transferor and transferee must complete a record of transfer on a form designed and made publicly available without fee for this purpose by the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. Each page of the record of transfer must be signed and dated by the transferor and the transferee and contain the serial number of the pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end . (b) The record of transfer must contain the following information: (1) a clear copy of each person's current state or federally issued identification; (2) a clear copy of the transferee permit presented by the transferee; and (3) a signed statement by the transferee swearing that the transferee is not currently prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a firearm. (c) The record of transfer must also contain the following information regarding the transferred pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end : (1) the type of pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end ; (2) the manufacturer, make, and model of the pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end ; and (3) the deleted text begin pistol or semiautomatic military-style assault weapon'sdeleted text end new text begin pistol'snew text end manufacturer-assigned serial number. (d) Both the transferor and the transferee must retain a copy of the record of transfer and any attachments to the record of transfer for 10 years from the date of the transfer. A copy in digital form shall be acceptable for the purposes of this paragraph. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7134, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Compulsory production of a record of transfer; misdemeanor penalty. (a) Unless a transfer was completed under subdivision 3, the transferor and transferee of a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end transferred under subdivision 4 must produce the record of transfer when a peace officer requests the record as part of a criminal investigation. (b) A person who refuses or is unable to produce a record of transfer for a firearm transferred under this section in response to a request for production made by a peace officer pursuant to paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor. A prosecution or conviction for violation of this subdivision is not a bar to conviction of, or punishment for, any other crime committed involving the transferred firearm. new text begin (c) This subdivision applies to records of transfers of semiautomatic military-style assault weapons under this section occurring before January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7141, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Transfer prohibited. (a) A person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for up to two years and to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000 if the person intentionally transfers a firearm to another and the person knows or reasonably should know that the transferee: (1) has been denied a permit to carry under section 624.714 because the transferee is not eligible under section 624.713 to possess a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end or any other firearm; (2) has been found ineligible to possess a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end by a chief of police or sheriff as a result of an application for a transferee permit or a transfer report; or (3) is disqualified under section 624.713 from possessing a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end or any other firearm. (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to the transfer of a firearm other than a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end to a person under the age of 18 who is not disqualified from possessing any other firearm. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7141, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Subsequent eligibility. This section is not applicable to a transfer to a person who became eligible to possess a pistol deleted text begin or semiautomatic military-style assault weapondeleted text end under section 624.713 after the transfer occurred but before the transferee used or possessed the weapon in furtherance of any crime. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.7181, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Penalties. Whoever carries a BB gun, rifle, or shotgun on or about the person in a public place is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. deleted text begin A person under the age of 21 who carries a semiautomatic military-style assault weapon, as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 7, on or about the person in a public place is guilty of a felony.deleted text end